District of Columbia statutes.
6-1411

Establishment of the District of Columbia Building Rehabilitation Code Advisory Council.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish the District of Columbia Building Rehabilitation Code Advisory Council consisting of the following members from among whom the Mayor shall designate a Chair:

(1)

The Director of Housing and Community Development, or his or her designee;

(2)

The Director of the DCRA, or his or her designee;

(3)

The Chief of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, or his or her designee;

(4)

The Chair of the Historic Preservation Review Board, or his or her designee;

(5)

The Chair of the Mayor’s Committee on Persons with Disabilities, or his or her designee;

(6)

The Chair of the Building Code Advisory Committee established by Mayor’s Order 89-257, November 7, 1989, who shall serve as an ex-officio member; and

(7)

Fourteen members appointed by the Mayor, as follows:

(A)

Four representatives of the building trades who are directly involved or have experience in code setting or enforcement, including plumbers; electricians; heating, ventilation, air-conditioning, and refrigeration contractors; and boiler operators;

(B)

Two architects practicing in the District whose practice involves a significant portion of rehabilitation projects;

(C)

A professional engineer;

(D)

Two contractors specializing in rehabilitation construction;

(E)

A commercial and industrial building owner or developer;

(F)

A multifamily building owner or developer; and

(G)

Three members of the general public.

(b)

(1)

The members shall serve a 4-year term; provided, that for the initial appointments under subsection (a)(6) of this section, ½ of the members shall be appointed for 2-year terms.

(2)

A member may continue to serve after the expiration of his or her term until a successor is appointed.

(3)

A member appointed to fill a vacancy, or after a term has begun, shall serve only for the remainder of the term and until a successor is appointed.

(4)

Appointed members shall serve no more than 2 terms.

(5)

Members shall serve without compensation and shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses.

(c)

The Rehabilitation Council shall:

(1)

Advise the Mayor on the development, adoption, and revisions to the BRC;

(2)

Develop, to the extent possible, the BRC to avoid increased costs to the District arising from implementation of the BRC; and

(3)

Provide, to the extent District funds are available, training on the BRC for District personnel responsible for administering the BRC and for public and private construction-related professionals.

(d)

DCRA shall provide administrative and staff services to the Rehabilitation Council.

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 10b
as added June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-162, § 201(a)(3), 49 DCR 4438

History

This section is referenced in § 6-1410.

Section References

Section 3(e) of D.C. Law 19-181 repealed this section.
Section 8 of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.
Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that sections 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of the act shall apply upon the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property pursuant to section 2 of the act.
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3(e) of the Sign Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-387, July 11, 2012, 59 DCR 8491).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 3(e) of the Sign Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-499, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12749), applicable after the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property, and with the condition that any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.

Emergency Legislation

Section 301 of D.C. Law 14-162 provided: “Pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.”

Section 3(e) of D.C. Law 19-289 would have repealed this section.

Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-289 provided “Any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-289, § 3: Section 10 of D.C. Law 19-289 provided that sections 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 of the act shall not apply until the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property pursuant to section 2 of the act. Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-289 rewrote §§ 1-303.21 and 1-303.23, and repealed § 1-303.22.

Editor's Notes